Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.410.283

Uniform, statewide performance assessment of teaching effectiveness—Prohibited as requirement.

The Washington professional educator standards board may not adopt rules requiring that candidates for residency teacher certification take or pass a uniform, statewide performance assessment of teaching effectiveness.

[ 2021 c 198 s 3.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2021 c 198: "(1) The legislature acknowledges that passing the evidence-based assessment of teaching effectiveness, known as the edTPA, may be a barrier to some candidates becoming fully certificated teachers in Washington. The legislature seeks to promote academic success and reduce barriers for all students, particularly candidates of color, candidates for whom English is a second language, and candidates from low-income households. The legislature is also concerned that candidates from low-income households have difficulty paying for the edTPA, which is administered by a third party.

(2) The legislature finds that the state approval process requires each teacher preparation program to ensure that teacher candidates demonstrate the most recently published interstate teacher assessment and support consortium standards, the state-adopted cultural competency standards, and the state-adopted social-emotional learning standards. The legislature recognizes that teacher candidates may demonstrate their knowledge, skills, and competencies in a variety of ways and settings. The legislature trusts that teacher preparation programs can use multiple measures to evaluate whether teacher candidates meet or exceed the standards, without relying on a statewide assessment. Therefore, the legislature intends to eliminate taking or passing the edTPA as a prerequisite for residency teacher state certification. Nothing in this legislation prohibits a teacher preparation program from using the edTPA as a formative tool so long as notification is included in all program descriptions." [ 2021 c 198 s 1.]

Effective date—2021 c 198: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [May 5, 2021]." [ 2021 c 198 s 7.]